Utah statutes.
67-5-11.   Employee accepting appointment to state position exempt from merit provisions -- Reinstatement in career status.

(1)  An employee in a career status accepting appointment to a position in state government which is exempt from the merit provisions of Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act, shall notify the attorney general in writing.  Upon termination of the appointment, unless discharged for cause, the employee, through written request of reinstatement made to the attorney general within 30 days from the effective date of termination from the appointment, shall be reinstated in a career status in the attorney general's office at a salary not less than that which he was receiving at the time of his appointment, and the time spent in the other position shall be credited toward seniority in the career service.  Reinstatement shall be made no later than 60 days after the written notification required by this Subsection (1) or 60 days after the effective date of termination from the employee's appointive position, whichever is later.  The position and assignment to which the employee shall return shall be determined by the attorney general.

(2) (a)  The Office of the Attorney General shall establish and maintain a separate seniority list for each employee category, which categories may include attorneys, investigators, paralegals, secretaries, and others.

(b) An employee of the Office of the Attorney General with less seniority than an employee in the same category entitled to be reinstated under this section holds his position subject to any reinstatement provided by Subsection (1).

